District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-716

Copies of orders to be transmitted to initiating state.

Repealed.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 85-94, § 16
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-316.
1973 Ed., § 30-316.